apertium-bel-rus.bel.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗІЙКЛМНОПРСТУЎФХЦЧШЫЬЭЮЯабвгдеёжзійклмнопрстуўфхцчшыьэюя</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>

    <sdef n="ma"      c="Masculine (animate)"/>
    <sdef n="mi"      c="Masculine (inanimate)"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="nt"      c="Neuter"/>

    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"     c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="ins"     c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="prp"     c="Prepositional"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <!-- Nouns -->
    <pardef n="ст/ол__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ол</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ол</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ала</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>алу</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>алом</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>але</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>алы</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>алы</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>алоў</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>алам</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аламі</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>алах</l>
          <r>ол<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="план__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>е</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аў</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>амі</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="суд__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>у</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>зе</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>оў</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>амі</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ах</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="пір/ог__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ог</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ог</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ага</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агу</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агом</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агу</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агі</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агі</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агоў</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агам</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агамі</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>агах</l>
          <r>ог<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="стол"><i>ст</i><par n="ст/ол__n"/></e>
    <e lm="пірог"><i>пір</i><par n="пір/ог__n"/></e>
    <e lm="план"><i>план</i><par n="план__n"/></e>
    <e lm="аўтобус"><i>аўтобус</i><par n="план__n"/></e>
    <e lm="клас"><i>клас</i><par n="план__n"/></e>
    <e lm="суд"><i>суд</i><par n="суд__n"/></e>
    <e lm="куст"><i>куст</i><par n="суд__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ліст"><i>ліст</i><par n="суд__n"/></e>
